wlg.lexd
PATTERNS
(adj_person | adj_class[old]) adj[old]
(adj_person | adj_class[new]) adj[new]

LEXICON adj
mak[new]         # good
buke[old]        # old

LEXICON adj_person
<1sg>:ngarra
<2sg>:kirri
<1du.excl>:ngana
<1incl>:ngarrak
<2du>:ngunu
<3du>:kinbarra
<1pl.excl>:ngadda
<2pl>:nguddu
<3pl>:kinbadda

LEXICON adj_class
<I>:na
<II>[old]:ki[old]
<II>[new]:kin[new]
<III>[old]:ma[old]
<III>[new]:man[new]
<IV>[old]:ku[old]
<IV>[new]:kun[new]

LEXICON Numeral
0
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9


LEXICON Punctuation
.<sent>:.
..<sent>:..
...<sent>:...
;<sent>:;
\:<sent>:\:
!<sent>:!
-<guio>:-
—<guio>:—
,<cm>:,
?<sent>:? 
'<apos>:'
"<quot>:"
«<lquot>:«
»<rquot>:»
”<rquot>:”
“<lquot>:“
(<lpar>:(
\]<rpar>:\]
\[<lpar>:\[
)<rpar>:)
\\<sent>:\\
\/<sent>:\/
